Louisiana, session 2026, HB517.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Children's Code Article 808 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
Art. 808. Constitutional rights of accused delinquents
A. All rights guaranteed to criminal defendants by the Constitution of the
United States or the Constitution of Louisiana, except the right to jury trial, shall be
applicable in juvenile court proceedings brought under pursuant to this Title.
B. The right to a jury trial does not apply to juvenile court proceedings
brought pursuant to this Title unless the juvenile is charged with a felony-grade
delinquent act that constitutes either a crime of violence as defined in R.S. 14:2(B)
or a sex offense as defined in R.S. 15:541.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1219 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 517